Hawaii statutes.
§467B-12.5 Written contracts; filing with
attorney general. (a) There shall be a written contract between a
charitable organization and a professional fundraising counsel or professional
solicitor that shall be filed by the professional fundraising counsel or
professional solicitor with the attorney general at least ten business days
prior to the performance by the professional fundraising counsel or
professional solicitor of any service. No solicitation or service pursuant to
the contract shall begin before the contract is filed with the attorney
general. The contract shall be signed by two authorized officials of the
charitable organization, one of whom shall be a member of the organization's
governing body, and the authorized contracting officer for the professional
fundraising counsel or professional solicitor. The contract shall contain all
of the following provisions:

(1) The legal name and address of the charitable
organization;

(2) A statement of the charitable purpose for which
the solicitation campaign is being conducted;

(3) A statement of the respective obligations of the
professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor and the charitable
organization;

(4) A statement of the guaranteed minimum percentage
of the gross receipts from contributions that will be remitted to or retained
by the charitable organization, if any, or, if the solicitation involves the
sale of goods, services, or tickets to a fundraising event, the percentage of
the purchase price that will be remitted to the charitable organization, if
any. The stated percentage shall exclude any amount that the charitable
organization is to pay as fundraising costs;

(5) Information concerning the compensation of the
professional solicitor and fundraising counsel as follows:

(A) If the compensation of the professional
fundraising counsel or professional solicitor is contingent upon the number of
contributions or the amount of revenue received, a statement shall be included
specifying the percentage of the gross revenue that is the basis for that
compensation. The stated percentage shall include any amount that the
professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor is to be reimbursed
for fundraising costs;

(B) If the compensation of the professional
solicitor is not contingent upon the number of contributions or amount of
revenue received from the solicitation campaign, the compensation shall be
expressed as a reasonable estimate of the percentage of the gross revenue, and
the contract shall clearly disclose the assumptions upon which the estimate is
based. The stated assumptions shall be based upon all of the relevant facts
known to the professional solicitor regarding the solicitation to be conducted
by the professional solicitor; or

(C) If the compensation of the fundraising
counsel is not contingent on the number of contributions or amount of revenue
received from the solicitation campaign, the compensation shall be stated in a
dollar amount;

(6) The effective and termination dates of the
contract or, if the contract does not have a set termination date, a clause
allowing either party a reasonable period to terminate the contract or notify
the other party if either party chooses not to renew. The contract shall also
contain the date services will commence with respect to solicitation in this
State of contributions for a charitable organization;

(7) In the case of a professional fundraising
counsel, a statement that the professional fundraising counsel will not at any
time have custody or control of contributions;

(8) A statement that the charitable organization
exercises control and approval over the content and volume of any solicitation;
and

(9) Any other information required by the rules of
the attorney general.

(b) No professional fundraising counsel or
professional solicitor shall contract with a charitable organization unless the
professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor is registered with
the department. A contract with an unregistered professional fundraising
counsel or professional solicitor shall be voidable at the option of the
charitable organization.

(c) Whenever a charitable organization
contracts with a professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor,
the charitable organization shall have the right to cancel the contract without
cost, penalty, or liability, for a period of ten days following the date on
which that contract is executed. Any provision in the contract that is
intended to waive this right of cancellation shall be void and unenforceable.

(d) A charitable organization may cancel a
contract pursuant to subsection (c) by serving a written notice of cancellation
on the professional fundraising counsel or professional solicitor. If mailed,
service shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, and cancellation
shall be deemed effective upon receipt by the professional fundraising counsel
or professional solicitor. The notice shall be sufficient if it indicates that
the charitable organization does not intend to be bound by the contract.

(e) Any funds collected after effective notice
that a contract has been canceled shall be deemed to be held in trust for the
benefit of the charitable organization without deduction for cost or expenses
of any nature. A charitable organization shall be entitled to recover all
funds collected after the date of cancellation. [L 2004, c 93, pt of §1; am L
2006, c 168, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next